Tennessee, session 114, SB1466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-213, is amended by deleting the
section.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 47, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
8-47-201. Part definitions.
As used in this part, "local official" means an elected member of a local
legislative body, mayor, sheriff, trustee, register, clerk, assessor of property, or member
of a school board.
8-47-202. Recall of local officials.
A local official may be removed from office by the registered voters of the
jurisdiction from which the local official was elected.
8-47-203. Recall process.
(a) A person who resides within the geographic boundaries of the jurisdiction of
which a local official is sought to be removed and who cast a vote in the last regular
election, may file a petition with the county election commission that demands the recall
of the elected local official. The petition must be signed by registered voters who reside
within the geographic boundaries of the jurisdiction of which the local official is sought to
be removed equal in number to at least sixty-six percent (66%) of the total vote cast for
the office in the last regular election. Each person signing the petition must sign the
SB1466
009100
- 1 -

person's name, provide the date of signing, and provide the signer's place of residence
by street and number or by other customary designation.
(b) The petition must contain a general statement of the grounds upon which the
removal is sought.
(c) At submission, the petition must include a sworn affidavit by the petition
circulator stating the number of petition signers, that each petition signature is the
genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be, that the signatures were
received within ninety (90) days of the start of the petition, and that the petition circulator
voted in favor of the local official sought to be removed in that local official's last regular
election.
(d) Within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the petition, the county election
commission shall determine the sufficiency of the petition signatures. The county
election commission shall attach a certificate to the petition with the results. If the county
election commission determines the petition signatures are:
(1) Sufficient, then within fifteen (15) days of such determination, the
county election commission shall give notice of the filed petition by publication in
a newspaper of general circulation and shall provide the grounds upon which
removal of a local official is sought; or
(2) Insufficient, then the person who filed the petition may amend the
petition within fifteen (15) days from the date of the certificate and file the
amended petition with the county election commission. Within thirty (30) days of
receipt of an amended petition, the county election commission shall make a
sufficiency determination. If the amended petition is still deemed insufficient or if
no amended petition is filed, then the county election commission shall attach a
certificate to the petition and return the petition to the person who filed the
- 2 - 009100

petition. If an amended petition is deemed sufficient, then the county election
commission shall provide notice as required by subdivision (d)(1).
(e) A separate petition must be filed for each local official sought to be removed.
8-47-204. Recall election.
(a) A county election commission shall call an election on the question of
whether to recall a local official if the county election commission determines that a
petition is sufficient in accordance with § 8-47-203(d).
(b) The question must only be posed to voters who are represented by the local
official sought to be removed.
(c) The question on the ballot must ask whether the local official should be
recalled, and the voter must be provided the option to vote "for recall" or "against recall."
(d) If a majority of those voting vote "for recall," then the person named is
removed from office and the office is declared vacant. A vacancy cannot be filled by
renaming the removed person to the office and the vacancy must be filled in accordance
with the applicable law for the office.
(e) No election for the purpose of recall shall be held within a period beginning
ninety (90) days before and ending ninety (90) days after a regular election.
SECTION 3. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the code commission is requested to
include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 009100